Maine, session 132, LD817.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §1743-A, first ¶, as amended by PL 2011, c. 691, Pt. B, §11, is
further amended to read:
Any contract for the construction, major alteration or repair of school buildings
involving a total cost in excess of $250,000, except contracts for professional, architectural
and engineering services, contracts for the purchase, repair or alteration of any nonbuilding
real property, including, but not limited to, an athletic field, and contracts for energy
conservation services in accordance with Title 20‑A, section 15915, must be awarded by
competitive bids. The school district directors, school committee, building committee or
whatever agency has responsibility for the construction, major alteration or repair shall,
after consultation with the Director of the Bureau of General Services, seek sealed
proposals. Sealed proposals must be addressed to the responsible agency and must remain
sealed until publicly opened in the presence of the responsible agency or a committee of
the responsible agency at such time as the responsible agency may direct. Competitive bids
may be waived in individual cases involving unusual circumstances with the written
approval of the Director of the Bureau of General Services and the Commissioner of
Education.
Sec. 2. 5 MRSA §1811, sub-§8, as amended by PL 2005, c. 12, Pt. T, §8, is further
amended to read:
8. Cooperative purchasing. To permit any political subdivision or school
administrative district unit in the State or nonprofit free health care clinic that provides free
primary or preventative services to make purchases of foodstuffs, materials, equipment and
supplies through the Bureau of General Services, subject to such procedures, rules and
regulations as may be prescribed by the director. This subsection applies to a municipality
notwithstanding any provision in its municipal charter to the contrary and to a school
administrative unit for the purpose of the purchase, repair or alteration of any nonbuilding
real property, including, but not limited to, an athletic field;